Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1162.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 102(a.1) and (q.1), 302(p), 1210(a.4)(5)123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) and (ii)(F), 1219, 1302(i)(1), 1302.1(a.3)(1) introductory paragraph, (i), (ii) and (iii), (2), (4) and (8), 1303(e), 1306(a) introductory paragraph, (b) and (c), 1308(a) and (g)(1), (1.1), (2), (3) and (4) introductory paragraph, 1302-D(a) and (f), 1303-D(e) and 1306-D(a) and (b) of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, are amended to read:Section 102. Definitions.--The following words, when used in this act, shall have the following meanings, unless otherwise clearly apparent from the context:* * *(a.1) The word "canvass" shall [mean the gathering of ballots after the final pre-canvass meeting and the counting, computing and tallying of the votes reflected on the ballots.] include gathering the ballots after the election and counting, computing and tallying the votes.* * *[(q.1) The word "pre-canvass" shall mean the inspection and opening of all envelopes containing official absentee ballots or mail-in ballots, the removal of such ballots from the envelopes and the counting, computing and tallying of the votes reflected on the ballots. The term does not include the recording or publishing of the votes reflected on the ballots.]* * *Section 302. Powers and Duties of County Boards.--The county boards of elections, within their respective counties, shall exercise, in the manner provided by this act, all powers granted to them by this act, and shall perform all the duties imposed upon them by this act, which shall include the following:* * *20250HB1162PN1288 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (p) A county board of elections shall not pay compensation to a judge of elections who wilfully fails to deliver by two o'clock A. M. on the day following the election envelopes; supplies, including all [uncast] provisional ballots, mail-in ballots and absentee ballots; and returns, including all provisional ballots cast in the election district and statements signed under sections 1306 and 1302-D.Section 1210. Manner of Applying to Vote; Persons Entitled to Vote; Voter's Certificates; Entries to Be Made in District Register; Numbered Lists of Voters; Challenges.--* * *(a.4) * * *(5) (i) Except as provided in subclause (ii), if it is determined that the individual was registered and entitled to vote at the election district where the ballot was cast, the county board of elections shall compare the signature on the provisional ballot envelope with the signature on the elector's registration form and, if the signatures are determined to be genuine, shall count the ballot if the county board of elections confirms that the individual did not cast any other ballot[, including an absentee ballot,] not voided under sections 1306(b) or 1306-D(b) in the election.(ii) A provisional ballot shall not be counted if:* * *(F) the elector's absentee ballot or mail-in ballot is [timely] received by a county board of elections[.] in accordance with the applicable deadlines specified in this act and which has not been voided at the request of the elector under sections 1306(b) or 1306-D(b).* * *Section 1219. Ballots to Be Issued by Election Officers 20250HB1162PN1288 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Only; Ballots Not to Be Removed; Official Ballots Only to Be Deposited or Counted.--No official ballot shall be taken from any book of ballots, except by an election officer or clerk when a person desiring to vote has been found to be a qualified elector entitled to vote. Not more than one ballot shall be removed at any one time or given to an elector, except in the case of a spoiled ballot as provided by this act. No person other than the election officers shall take or remove any ballot from the polling place. No ballot without the official endorsement shall, except as herein otherwise provided, be deposited in the ballot box, and no other ballots shall be counted. If any ballot appears to have been obtained otherwise than from the county board as provided by this act, the same shall not be counted, and the judge of election shall transmit such ballot to the district attorney without delay, together with whatever information he may have regarding the same. If an elector attests that an absentee or mail-in ballot has been issued in the elector's name that the elector did not request, the elector shall be permitted to inspect the ballot and the county shall provide a complaint form. The complaint form and the voided ballot with envelope, if available, shall be submitted to the local district attorney for investigation.Section 1302. Applications for Official Absentee Ballots.--* * *(i) (1) Application for official absentee ballots shall be on physical and electronic forms prescribed by the Secretary of the Commonwealth. The application shall state that an elector who applies for an absentee ballot pursuant to section 1301 shall not be eligible to vote at a polling place on election day unless the elector [brings the elector's absentee ballot to the 20250HB1162PN1288 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 elector's polling place, remits the ballot and the envelope containing the declaration of the elector to the judge of elections to be spoiled] has the elector's absentee ballot with the envelope containing the declaration of the elector voided at the elector's polling place and signs a statement subject to the penalties of 18 Pa.C.S. § 4904 (relating to unsworn falsification to authorities) to the same effect. Such physical application forms shall be made freely available to the public at county board of elections, municipal buildings and at such other locations designated by the secretary. Such electronic application forms shall be made freely available to the public through publicly accessible means. No written application or personal request shall be necessary to receive or access the application forms. Copies and records of all completed physical and electronic applications for official absentee ballots shall be retained by the county board of elections.* * *Section 1302.1. Date of Application for Absentee Ballot.--* * *(a.3) (1) The following categories of electors may apply for an absentee ballot under this subsection, if otherwise qualified, upon execution of an emergency application in the form prescribed by the Secretary of the Commonwealth:(i) An elector whose physical disability or illness prevented the elector from applying for an absentee ballot before five o'clock P.M. on the first Tuesday prior to the day of the primary or election and who is unable to appear at the appropriate polling place on the day of the primary or election.(ii) An elector who, because of the elector's business, duties or occupation, was unable to apply for an absentee ballot 20250HB1162PN1288 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 before five o'clock P.M. on the first Tuesday prior to the day of the primary or election and who is unable to appear at the appropriate polling place on the day of the primary or election.(iii) An elector who becomes so physically disabled or ill after five o'clock P.M. on the first Tuesday prior to the day of the primary or election that the elector is unable to appear at the appropriate polling place on the day of the primary or election.* * *(2) An elector described in paragraph (1) may submit an emergency application for an absentee ballot at any time up until the time of the closing of the polls on the day of the primary or election. The application shall include a declaration describing the circumstances that prevented the elector from applying for an absentee ballot before five o'clock P.M. on the first Tuesday prior to the day of the primary or election [or] and that prevent the elector from appearing at the polling place on the day of the primary or election, and the elector's qualifications under paragraph (1). The declaration shall be made subject to the provisions of 18 Pa.C.S. § 4904 (relating to unsworn falsification to authorities).* * *(4) If the elector is unable to appear at the office of the county board of elections to receive the ballot, the board shall give the elector's absentee ballot to an authorized representative of the elector who is designated in writing by the elector. The authorized representative shall deliver the absentee ballot to the elector and return the completed absentee ballot, sealed in the official absentee ballot envelopes, to the office of the county board of elections, which shall retain the 20250HB1162PN1288 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ballot, unopened, until the ballots are dispensed to the local elections boards if the ballot is received prior to five o'clock P.M. on the Friday before the election. If the ballot is received after five o'clock P.M. on the Friday before the election, the envelope shall remain unopened until the canvassing of all absentee ballots.* * *(8) No absentee ballot under this subsection shall be counted which is received in the office of the county board of elections later than [the deadline for its receipt as provided in section 1308(g)] eight o'clock P.M. on the day of the election.* * *Section 1303. Official Absentee Voters Ballots.--* * *(e) The official absentee voter ballot shall state that an elector who [receives] requests an absentee ballot pursuant to section 1301 and whose voted ballot is not [timely] received by the commission as required under section 1308(g) and who, on election day, is capable of voting at the appropriate polling place may only vote on election day by provisional ballot [unless the elector brings the elector's absentee ballot to the elector's polling place, remits the ballot and the envelope containing the declaration of the elector to the judge of elections to be spoiled] after the elector first signs an affidavit stating the elector has not cast any other ballot in the election, directs the requested ballot to be voided and signs a statement subject to the penalties under 18 Pa.C.S. § 4904 (relating to unsworn falsification to authorities) to the same effect. An elector may cast a regular ballot at the appropriate polling place if the elector's absentee ballot, 20250HB1162PN1288 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 whether voted or unvoted, with the envelope containing the declaration of the elector, is voided at the elector's polling place and the elector signs a statement subject to the penalties of 18 Pa.C.S. § 4904. Section 1306. Voting by Absentee Electors.--(a) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3), at any time after receiving an official absentee ballot, but on or before [eight o'clock P.M. the day of the primary or election] the required time under section 1308(g), the elector shall, in secret, proceed to mark the ballot only in black lead pencil, indelible pencil or blue, black or blue-black ink, in fountain pen or ball point pen, and then fold the ballot, enclose and securely seal the same in the envelope on which is printed, stamped or endorsed "Official Election Ballot." This envelope shall then be placed in the second one, on which is printed the form of declaration of the elector, and the address of the elector's county board of election and the local election district of the elector. The elector shall then fill out, date and sign the declaration printed on such envelope. Such envelope shall then be securely sealed and the elector shall send same by mail, postage prepaid, except where franked, or deliver it in person to said county board of election.* * *(b) (1) Any elector who receives and votes an absentee ballot pursuant to section 1301 shall not be eligible to vote at a polling place on election day unless the elector requests the ballot with envelope be voided and signs an affidavit. The district register at each polling place shall clearly identify electors who have [received and voted] requested absentee ballots as ineligible to vote at the polling place, [and 20250HB1162PN1288 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 district] unless the elector has the ballot with the envelope voided and signs an affidavit requesting the ballot be voided. District election officers shall not permit electors who voted an absentee ballot to vote at the polling place[.] without completing the requirements of this section. The elector shall sign an affidavit, in the presence of the local judge of elections, in the appropriate local election district. The affidavit shall be in substantially the following form:I hereby swear that I am a qualified registered elector who has requested an absentee ballot. However, I am present in the municipality of my residence and request that my absentee ballot be voided.(Date)(Signature of Elector)(Name and Address of Elector)(Local Judge of Elections)(2) An elector who requests an absentee ballot and who is not shown on the district register as having voted the ballot [may] and is now claiming to not have a ballot with envelope to void may sign the affidavit specified in subsection (b)(1) declaring the ballot void and vote by provisional ballot under section 1210(a.4)(1).(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), an elector who requests an absentee ballot and who is not shown on the district register as having voted the ballot may vote at the polling place if the elector [remits] has the ballot and the envelope containing the declaration of the elector [to] voided by the judge of elections to be spoiled and the elector signs both the affidavit under subsection (b)(1) and a statement subject to the penalties under 18 Pa.C.S. § 4904 (relating to unsworn falsification to 20250HB1162PN1288 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 authorities) in substantially the following form:I hereby declare that I am a qualified registered elector who has obtained an absentee ballot or mail-in ballot. I further declare that I have not cast my absentee ballot or mail-in ballot, and that instead I remitted my absentee ballot or mail-in ballot and the envelope containing the declaration of the elector to the judge of elections at my polling place to be spoiled and therefore request that my absentee ballot or mail-in ballot be voided.(Date)(Signature of Elector)................(Address of Elector)(Local Judge of Elections)(c) [Except as provided under 25 Pa.C.S. § 3511 (relating to receipt of voted ballot), a] A completed absentee ballot must be received in the office of the county board of elections no later than [eight o'clock P.M. on the day of the primary or election] specified under section 1308(g).Section 1308. Canvassing of Official Absentee Ballots and Mail-in Ballots.--(a) The county boards of election, upon receipt of official absentee ballots in sealed official absentee ballot envelopes as provided under this article and mail-in ballots as in sealed official mail-in ballot envelopes as provided under Article XIII-D, shall safely keep the ballots in sealed or locked containers until they are [to be canvassed by the county board of elections. An absentee ballot, whether issued to a civilian, military or other voter during the regular or emergency application period, shall be canvassed in accordance with subsection (g). A mail-in ballot shall be canvassed in accordance with subsection (g).] distributed to the appropriate local election districts. The county board of 20250HB1162PN1288 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 elections shall distribute the absentee ballots and mail-in ballots, unopened, in a sealed container to the absentee or mail-in voter's respective election district concurrently with the distribution of other election supplies, with the exception of ballots provided under subsection (g). Except as provided in subsection (g), no absentee ballot or mail-in ballot shall be counted if the ballot is received in the office of the county board of elections later than five o'clock P.M. on the Friday immediately preceding the election. All absentee ballots and mail-in ballots shall be returned to the county board of elections, in a sealed container in accordance with section 302(p), to be canvassed.* * *(g) (1) (i) An absentee ballot cast by any absentee elector as defined in section 1301(a), (b), (c), (d), (e), (f), (g) and (h) shall be canvassed in accordance with this subsection if the ballot is cast, submitted and received in accordance with the provisions of 25 Pa.C.S. Ch. 35 (relating to uniform military and overseas voters).(ii) An absentee ballot [cast by any absentee elector as defined in section 1301(i), (j), (k), (l), (m) and (n), an absentee ballot under section 1302(a.3) or a mail-in ballot cast by a mail-in elector] under section 1302.1(a.3) shall be canvassed in accordance with this subsection if the absentee ballot or mail-in ballot is received in the office of the county board of elections no later than eight o'clock P.M. on the day of the primary or election.(iii) An absentee ballot cast by an absentee elector as defined in section 1301(i), (j), (k), (l), (m) and (n), or a mail-in ballot cast by a mail-in elector shall be canvassed in 20250HB1162PN1288 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 accordance with this subsection if the absentee ballot or mail-in ballot is received in the office of the county board of elections no later than five o'clock P.M. on the Friday immediately preceding the election.[(1.1) The county board of elections shall meet no earlier than seven o'clock A.M. on election day to pre-canvass all ballots received prior to the meeting. A county board of elections shall provide at least forty-eight hours' notice of a pre-canvass meeting by publicly posting a notice of a pre-canvass meeting on its publicly accessible Internet website. One authorized representative of each candidate in an election and one representative from each political party shall be permitted to remain in the room in which the absentee ballots and mail-in ballots are pre-canvassed. No person observing, attending or participating in a pre-canvass meeting may disclose the results of any portion of any pre-canvass meeting prior to the close of the polls.](2) The county board of elections shall meet no earlier than the close of polls on the day of the election and no later than the third day following the election to begin canvassing absentee ballots and mail-in ballots [not included in the pre-canvass meeting]. The meeting under this paragraph shall continue until all absentee ballots and mail-in ballots received [prior to the close of the polls] in accordance with this act have been canvassed. The county board of elections shall not record or publish any votes reflected on the ballots prior to the close of the polls. The canvass process shall continue through the eighth day following the election for valid military-overseas ballots timely received under 25 Pa.C.S. § 3511 (relating to receipt of voted ballot). A county board of 20250HB1162PN1288 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 elections shall provide at least forty-eight hours' notice of a canvass meeting by publicly posting a notice on its publicly accessible Internet website. One authorized representative of each candidate in an election and one representative from each political party shall be permitted to remain in the room in which the absentee ballots and mail-in ballots are canvassed.(3) When the county board meets to pre-canvass or canvass absentee ballots and mail-in ballots under [paragraphs (1), (1.1) and (2)] the provisions of this act, the board shall examine the declaration on the envelope of each ballot not set aside under subsection (d) and shall compare the information thereon with that contained in the "Registered Absentee and Mail-in Voters File," the absentee voters' list, the district register and/or the "Military Veterans and Emergency Civilians Absentee Voters File," whichever is applicable. If the county board has verified the proof of identification as required under this act and is satisfied that the declaration is sufficient and the information contained in the "Registered Absentee and Mail-in Voters File," the absentee voters' list and/or the "Military Veterans and Emergency Civilians Absentee Voters File" verifies his right to vote, the county board shall provide a list of the names of electors whose absentee ballots or mail-in ballots are to be [pre-canvassed or] canvassed.(4) All absentee ballots [which have not been challenged under section 1302.2(c) and all] and mail-in ballots which have not been voided or challenged under [section 1302.2-D(a)(2)] the provisions of this act and that have been verified under paragraph (3) shall be counted and included with the returns of the applicable election district as follows:* * *20250HB1162PN1288 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 1302-D. Applications for official mail-in ballots.(a) General rule.--A qualified elector under section 1301-D may apply at any time before five o'clock P.M. of the first Tuesday prior to any primary or election for an official mail-in ballot in person or on any official county board of election form addressed to the Secretary of the Commonwealth or the county board of election of the county in which the qualified elector's voting residence is located.* * *(f) Form.--Application for an official mail-in ballot shall be on physical and electronic forms prescribed by the Secretary of the Commonwealth. The application shall state that [a voter] an elector who applies for a mail-in ballot under section 1301-D shall not be eligible to vote at a polling place on election day unless the elector [brings the elector's mail-in ballot to the elector's polling place, remits the ballot and the envelope containing the declaration of the elector to the judge of elections to be spoiled] has the ballot with the envelope containing the declaration of the elector voided at the elector's polling place and signs a statement subject to the penalties under 18 Pa.C.S. § 4904 (relating to unsworn falsification to authorities) to the same effect. The physical application forms shall be made freely available to the public at county board of elections, municipal buildings and at other locations designated by the Secretary of the Commonwealth. The electronic application forms shall be made freely available to the public through publicly accessible means. No written application or personal request shall be necessary to receive or access the application forms. Copies and records of all completed physical and electronic applications for official 20250HB1162PN1288 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 mail-in ballots shall be retained by the county board of elections.* * *Section 1303-D. Official mail-in elector ballots.* * *(e) Notice.--The official mail-in voter ballot shall state that [a voter] an elector who [receives] requests a mail-in ballot under section 1301-D and whose voted mail-in ballot is not [timely] received as required under section 1308(g) may only vote on election day by provisional ballot [unless the elector brings the elector's mail-in ballot to the elector's polling place, remits the ballot and the envelope containing the declaration of the elector to the judge of elections to be spoiled] after the elector first signs an affidavit stating that the elector has not cast any other ballot in the election, directs the requested ballot be voided and signs a statement subject to the penalties of 18 Pa.C.S. § 4904 (relating to unsworn falsification to authorities) to the same effect. An elector may cast a regular ballot at the appropriate polling place if the elector's mail-in ballot, whether voted or unvoted, with the envelope containing the declaration of the elector is voided at the elector's polling place and signs a statement subject to the penalties of 18 Pa.C.S. § 4904. Section 1306-D. Voting by mail-in electors.(a) General rule.--At any time after receiving an official mail-in ballot, but on or before [eight o'clock P.M. the day of the primary or election] the specified requirements under section 1308(g), the mail-in elector shall, in secret, proceed to mark the ballot only in black lead pencil, indelible pencil or blue, black or blue-black ink, in fountain pen or ball point 20250HB1162PN1288 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 pen, and then fold the ballot, enclose and securely seal the same in the envelope on which is printed, stamped or endorsed "Official Election Ballot." This envelope shall then be placed in the second one, on which is printed the form of declaration of the elector, and the address of the elector's county board of election and the local election district of the elector. The elector shall then fill out, date and sign the declaration printed on such envelope. Such envelope shall then be securely sealed and the elector shall send same by mail, postage prepaid, except where franked, or deliver it in person to said county board of election.* * *(b) Eligibility.--(1) Any elector who receives and votes a mail-in ballot under section 1301-D shall not be eligible to vote at a polling place on election day unless the elector requests that the ballot with envelope be voided and an affidavit is signed. The district register at each polling place shall clearly identify electors who have [received and voted] requested mail-in ballots as ineligible to vote at the polling place[, and district] unless the elector has the ballot with envelope voided and signs an affidavit. District election officers shall not permit electors who voted a mail-in ballot to vote at the polling place[.] without completing the requirements of this section. The elector shall sign an affidavit, in the presence of the local judge of elections in the appropriate local election district. The affidavit shall be in substantially the following form:I hereby swear that I am a qualified registered elector who has requested an absentee ballot. However, I am present in 20250HB1162PN1288 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the municipality of my residence and request that my absentee ballot be voided.(Date)(Signature of Elector)(Name and Address of Elector)(Local Judge of Elections)(2) An elector who requests a mail-in ballot and who is not shown on the district register as having voted [may] but does not have a ballot with envelope to void may sign the affidavit under paragraph (1) declaring the ballot void and vote by provisional ballot under section 1210(a.4)(1).(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), an elector who requests a mail-in ballot and who is not shown on the district register as having voted the ballot may vote at the polling place if the elector [remits] has the ballot and the envelope containing the declaration of the elector [to] voided by the judge of elections [to be spoiled] and the elector signs both the affidavit under subsection (b)(1) and a statement subject to the penalties of 18 Pa.C.S. § 4904 (relating to unsworn falsification to authorities) which shall be in substantially the following form:I hereby declare that I am a qualified registered elector who has obtained an absentee ballot or mail-in ballot. I further declare that I have not cast my absentee ballot or mail-in ballot, and that instead I remitted my absentee ballot or mail-in ballot to the judge of elections at my polling place to be spoiled and therefore request that my absentee ballot or mail-in ballot be voided.(Date)(Signature of Elector)...........(Address of Elector)20250HB1162PN1288 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Local Judge of Elections)* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1162PN1288 - 18 - 123